Utah statutes.
10-5-118.   Emergency expenditures.

(1)  The council, on determining that an emergency exists, such as widespread damage from fire, flood, or earthquake, and that the emergency necessitates the expenditure of money in excess of the budget of the general fund, may amend the budget and authorize such expenditures as may be reasonably necessary to meet the emergency.

(2)  Except to the extent provided for in Title 53, Chapter 2, Part 4, Disaster Recovery Funding Act, a council of a town may not expend money in the town's local fund for an emergency, if the town creates a local fund under Title 53, Chapter 2, Part 4, Disaster Recovery Funding Act.



Amended by Chapter 328, 2007 General Session

